csv2yaml/yaml_output/VAI_Imp_V.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     niimi+VAI+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg+NA: niimiikan
     niimi+VAI+Imp+NA+Del+2Pl+NA: niimiikeg
     niimi+VAI+Imp+NA+Del+Incl+NA: niimiikang
     nagamo+VAI+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg+NA: nagamookan
     nagamo+VAI+Imp+NA+Del+2Pl+NA: nagamookeg
     nagamo+VAI+Imp+NA+Del+Incl+NA: nagamookang
     niimi+VAI+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg+NA: niimiken
     niimi+VAI+Imp+NA+Prb+2Pl+NA: niimikegon
     niimi+VAI+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+NA: niimisiidaa
     nagamo+VAI+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg+NA: nagamoken
     nagamo+VAI+Imp+NA+Prb+2Pl+NA: nagamokegon
     nagamo+VAI+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+NA: nagamosiidaa
     niimi+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg+NA: niimin
     niimi+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+2Pl+NA: [niimig,niimik]
     niimi+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+NA: niimidaa
     nagamo+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg+NA: nagamon
     nagamo+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+2Pl+NA: [nagamog,nagamok]
     nagamo+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+NA: nagamodaa
